Washington statutes.
RCW 13.04.155

Notification to designated recipient of adjudication or conviction—Information exempt from disclosure.

(1) The provisions of this section apply only to persons who:

(a) Were adjudicated in juvenile court or convicted in adult criminal court of:

(i) A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(ii) A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(iii) Any crime under chapter 9.41 RCW; or

(iv) Unlawful possession or delivery, or both, of a controlled substance in violation of chapter 69.50 RCW;

(b) Are twenty-one years of age or younger; and

(c) Have not received a high school diploma or its equivalent.

(2)(a) The court must provide written notification of the juvenile court adjudication or adult criminal court conviction of a person described in subsection (1) of this section to the designated recipient of the school where the person:

(i) Was enrolled prior to adjudication or conviction; or

(ii) Has expressed an intention to enroll following adjudication or conviction.

(b) No notification is required if the person described in subsection (1) of this section is between eighteen and twenty-one years of age and:

(i) The person's prior or intended enrollment information cannot be obtained; or

(ii) The person asserts no intention of enrolling in an educational program.

(3) Any information received by a designated recipient under this section is exempt from disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "designated recipient" means: (a) The superintendent of the school district, or his or her designee, of a common school as defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a school that is the subject of a state-tribal education compact under chapter 28A.715 RCW; (b) the administrator of a charter public school governed by chapter 28A.710 RCW; or (c) the administrator of a private school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

[ 2020 c 167 s 6; 2000 c 27 s 1; 1997 c 266 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Severability—1997 c 266: See notes following RCW 28A.600.455.